District of Columbia statutes.
31-4413

Payments for capital stock.

No company incorporated under this chapter shall be authorized to transact any business until the authorized capital stock shall have been actually paid in, either in cash or in investments authorized by this subdivision at market value; and it shall be lawful for the directors to call in and demand from the stockholders the residue of their subscriptions in money or property at such times and in such instalments as the directors shall deem proper, under the penalty of forfeiting the shares of capital stock subscribed for and all previous payments made thereon, if payment shall not be made by the stockholder within 60 days after a personal demand or a notice requiring such payment shall have been published once a week for 3 consecutive weeks in a daily newspaper in the District.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1147, ch. 672, ch. III, § 13
1981 Ed., § 35-613.
1973 Ed., § 35-513.